District of Columbia statutes.
2-381.41

New contracts with costs exceeding existing contracts.

The Mayor shall not enter into any new contract for goods or services the cost of which exceeds the cost of an existing contract for the same goods or services, when the current contractor is willing to continue to provide the goods or services at the price of the existing contract, as long as the contractor is providing satisfactory service; nor shall the Mayor extend any existing contract for any amount over the price agreed to in the existing contract. Nothing contained in this section shall prohibit the Mayor from putting a contract out for bid for a lower price.

Sept. 26, 1995, D.C. Law 11-52, § 816, 42 DCR 3684
This section is referenced in § 2-325.01.
2001 Ed., § 2-325.01.
1981 Ed., § 1-1181.6a.
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 4 of the Budget Implementation Temporary Act of 1995 (D.C. Law 11-18, May 27, 1995, law notification 42 DCR 2845).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see §§ 2 through 5 of the Oak Hill Youth Center Educational Contracting Temporary Act of 1996 (D.C. Law 11-193, April 9, 1997, law notification 44 DCR 2388).